Wyoming, session 2025, SF0082.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
[2025-2026 WATER PROGRAM]
[AUTHORIZED LEVEL I AND LEVEL II STUDIES]
Section 1. LEVEL I RECONNAISSANCE STUDIES – NEW
DEVELOPMENT. The following sums of money are appropriated
from water development account I, as created by W.S.
41-2-124(a)(i), to the water development commission to be
expended to conduct the following reconnaissance studies as
defined in W.S. 41-2-114. Funds appropriated under this
section for a particular project that are in excess of the
actual amount necessary to complete the study may, subject
to the review and recommendation of the select water
committee, be expended by the commission to complete the
reconnaissance study for any other project listed in this
section. Appropriated funds not expended or obligated prior
to July 1, 2028 shall revert to water development account
I. The commission shall submit a report to the legislature
on each of the following studies prior to the 2027
legislative session:
[LEVEL I RECONNAISSANCE STUDIES - NEW DEVELOPMENT]
PROJECT LOCATION APPROPRIATION
Hulett Water Master Plan Crook County $166,000
UW Water Research Program Statewide $368,998
1

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0082
ENROLLED ACT NO. 26, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Total appropriation for Section 1 $534,998
Section 2. LEVEL I RECONNAISSANCE STUDIES –
REHABILITATION. The following sums of money are
appropriated from water development account II, as created
by W.S. 41-2-124(a)(ii), to the water development
commission to be expended to conduct the following
reconnaissance studies as defined in W.S. 41-2-114. Funds
appropriated under this section for a particular project
that are in excess of the actual amount necessary to
complete the study may, subject to the review and
recommendation of the select water committee, be expended
by the commission to complete the reconnaissance study for
any other project listed in this section. Appropriated
funds not expended or obligated prior to July 1, 2028 shall
revert to water development account II. The commission
shall submit a report to the legislature on each of the
following studies prior to the 2027 legislative session.
[LEVEL I RECONNAISSANCE STUDIES - REHABILITATION]
PROJECT LOCATION APPROPRIATION
Pioneer Canal Lake Hattie
Irrigation District Master Plan Albany County $236,000
Smith's Fork Irrigation District
Master Plan Lincoln County $272,000
Wheatland Irrigation District Albany, Carbon,
Master Plan Platte Counties $472,000
Total appropriation for Section 2 $980,000
Section 3. LEVEL II FEASIBILITY STUDIES – DAMS AND
RESERVOIRS. The following sums of money are appropriated
from water development account III, as created by W.S.
41-2-124(a)(iii), to the water development commission to be
expended to conduct the following feasibility studies as
defined in W.S. 41-2-114. Appropriated funds not expended
2

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0082
ENROLLED ACT NO. 26, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
or obligated prior to July 1, 2028 shall revert to water
development account III. The commission shall submit a
report to the legislature on each of the following studies
prior to the 2027 legislative session.
[LEVEL II FEASIBILITY STUDIES – DAMS AND RESERVOIRS]
PROJECT LOCATION APPROPRIATION
Middle Popo Agie River
Storage Study Fremont County $551,000
Total appropriation for Section 3 $551,000
3

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0082
ENROLLED ACT NO. 26, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 4. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
4